Arkansas, session 2025, HB1439.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-10-2301(b), concerning the purpose and
intent of the licensure of private care agencies, is amended to read as
follows:
(b) It is the purpose of this subchapter to:
(1) Allow a licensed private care agency to provide in-home
personal care services twenty-four (24) hours a day and seven (7) days a week
to eligible recipients;
(2) Provide for the reimbursement of the personal care services
through Medicaid; and
(3) Authorize the Department of Human Services in its
administration of the Arkansas Medicaid Program to set forth Medicaid
provider participation requirements for a private care agency that will
ensure sufficient available personal care service providers in order to meet
the needs of all eligible recipients, including available in-home personal
care services twenty-four (24) hours a day and seven (7) days a week.

*JMB298*
02/09/2025 7:39:34 PM JMB298

HB1439
SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 20-10-2302 is amended to read as follows:
20-10-2302. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter, “private care agency” means a provider that
is certified by the Division of Provider Services and Quality Assurance as a
provider of home- and community-based health services licensed by the
Department of Health as a private care agency and that:
(1) Furnishes in-home staffing services for personal and
attendant care services for which the provider seeks reimbursement through
the Arkansas Medicaid Program; and
(2) Retains liability insurance of not less than one million
dollars ($1,000,000) to cover its employees and independent contractors while
its employees and independent contractors are engaged in providing personal
and attendant care services.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 20-10-2304(c)(3)(B), concerning the rules
for private care agencies, is amended to read as follows:
(B) A private care agency maintain a primary location in
Arkansas and a sufficient number of regional offices to adequately service
the administrative needs of the private care agency and the patients of the
private care agency; and
















02/09/2025 7:39:34 PM JMB298